Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Chapter 11. Private Shooting Preserves

§ 49-11-1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Commission” means the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Department” means the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Operator” means a person licensed to operate a shooting preserve or a commercial wildlife enclosure.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-11-3.
Persons to whom operating licenses may be issued; area and other requirements; regulatory authority.

The department may issue operating licenses to any person, partnership, association or corporation for the operation of shooting preserves or commercial wildlife enclosures that meet the following requirements and any applicable regulations:

Each shooting preserve shall contain a minimum of one hundred (100) acres in one (1) tract of leased or owned land (including water area, if any) and shall be restricted to not more than six hundred forty (640) contiguous acres (including water area, if any), except that preserves confined to the releasing of ducks only may be authorized to operate with a minimum of fifty (50) contiguous acres (including water area).

The boundaries of each shooting preserve shall be clearly defined and posted with signs erected at intervals of three hundred (300) feet or less.

Each commercial wildlife enclosure shall contain a minimum of three hundred (300) acres in one (1) tract of leased or owned land (including water area, if any). No commercial wildlife enclosure shall be constructed in such a manner as to allow ingress of native wild animals without providing means of egress.

The preserve or enclosure must be privately owned and operated.

The commission may issue any rules or regulations necessary to regulate shooting preserves and commercial wildlife enclosures and to enforce this chapter.

The commission may regulate the hunting of nonnative cervids within a commercial wildlife enclosure, and the department may enter such enclosure as provided under Section 49-11-25 and enforce such regulations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-02; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 516, § 9; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2005, ch. 530, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 399, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 523, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 326, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 422, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 305, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 49-11-5.
Fees for shooting preserve and commercial wildlife enclosure licenses.

The fee for a shooting preserve license or a commercial wildlife enclosure license shall be One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per year for the first three hundred (300) acres of shooting preserve area or commercial wildlife enclosure area, and Ten Dollars ($10.00) per year for each additional one hundred (100) acres or parts thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-04; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 4; Laws, 1979, ch. 375, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-11-7.
License to indicate whether preserve or commercial wildlife enclosure is open to public; records of department.

Each license issued by the department shall designate whether or not the preserve or commercial wildlife enclosure is open to the public on a commercial basis, or is restricted to a membership or other limited group. In the latter case, the license shall specify that the area is a restricted shooting preserve or commercial wildlife enclosure. The department shall maintain accurate listings of the names and addresses of the licensees and the location of the property. These lists shall be made available in their entirety to anyone requesting a copy, and shall specify whether the preserves or enclosures are public or private.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-12; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 12; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-11-9.
Chapter and license hereunder to be supplemental and additional.

This chapter is supplemental and in addition to any other laws on related subject matters. Any license required under this chapter is in addition to any other licenses which may be required for commercial raising and sale of game birds or for the raising of game birds for propagation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-13; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 13; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-11-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1989, ch. 377, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

[Codes, 1942, § 5899-11; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 11]

§ 49-11-13.
Hunting season.

The season for shooting preserves shall be for a period of seven (7) months beginning October 1 and ending April 30, except as further restricted by the operator.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-07; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 7; Laws, 1979, ch. 375, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 304 § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-11-15.
Game which may be hunted; authority of commission.

Artificially propagated pheasants, quail, chukar partridges, mallards and black ducks, and any game bird authorized by the commission are the only game which may be hunted on shooting preserves under this chapter.

Mallards and black ducks released on a shooting preserve must have a one-fourth (1/4) inch hole punched in the outer web of the right foot before the birds attain the age of six (6) weeks.

The commission is authorized to specify the species of non-native wild game that may be released or hunted in commercial wildlife enclosures.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 375, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-11-17.
Recovery of released game.

The operating licenses issued by the department shall entitle licensees, and their guests or customers, to recover the total number of each species of game released on the premises each year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 5; Laws, 1979, ch. 375, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-11-19.
Authority of operators restrictions.

Operators may establish shooting limitations and restrictions on the age, sex and number of each species of released game that may be taken by each person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 6; Laws, 1979, ch. 375, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-11-21.
Harvesting of wild game on shooting preserves or commercial wildlife enclosures.

Any native wild game found on shooting preserves or commercial wildlife enclosures may be harvested only in accordance with applicable game and hunting laws and regulations issued by the commission or the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-10; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 10; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-11-23.
Certificate issued to hunter or person leaving preserve with harvested game.

The operator shall furnish and issue a consecutively numbered certificate to any hunter or person leaving with harvested game. The certificate shall bear the license number and name of the shooting preserve or commercial wildlife enclosure or its licensed operator. The certificate shall contain the person’s name, address, date of issuance and number and species of harvested game in possession. The certificate must remain with the harvested game until the game is prepared for consumption.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-08; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 8; Laws, 1979, ch 375, § 7; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-11-25.
Records of operators; consent to patrolling of preserve or enclosure areas.

Each operator shall maintain a registration book listing the names and hunting license numbers of all hunters and the date on which they hunted. An accurate record must be maintained of the total number, by species, of game released and harvested each day the preserve or enclosure is hunted. The operator shall submit this information in an annual report of operations each year to the department not later than June 1 following. These records shall be open to inspection by the department at any reasonable time. Any person, partnership, association or corporation licensed hereunder consents to the patrolling of the shooting preserve or commercial wildlife enclosure areas by the department, without warrant, to determine if any of the game laws or regulations are being violated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-09; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 9; Laws, 1979, ch. 375, § 8; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-11-27.
Penalties for violations.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any provision of this chapter is guilty of a Class I violation, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-141. A multiple violator of this chapter shall be assessed double the maximum allowable fine.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899-14; Laws, 1962, ch. 182, § 14; Laws, 1979, ch. 375, § 9; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 16; Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 14; Laws, 2007, ch. 516, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 422, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2012.).

§ 49-11-29.
Chapter not applicable to fox, coyote, or rabbit enclosures.

This chapter shall not apply to the operation of fox, coyote and rabbit enclosures as set forth in Section 49-7-34, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall not be construed to regulate the operation of fox, coyote and rabbit enclosures.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 546, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1997.